Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2303
Approved certification program, defined.

Approved certification program means a certification process for nurse practitioners utilized by an approved certifying body that (1) requires evidence of completion of a formal program of study in the nurse practitioner clinical specialty, (2) requires successful completion of a nationally recognized certification examination developed by the approved certifying body, (3) provides an ongoing recertification program, and (4) is approved by the board.

Laws 1984, LB 724, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 20;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 38;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 53;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1716.02;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 795.